Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.183

Time limit for creation of commission—Penalty.

In ninety days after the taking effect of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the duly constituted authorities in each such city, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to appoint and create a civil service commission as provided for in RCW 41.08.010, and the failure upon the part of said duly constituted authorities, or any of them, so to do, shall be deemed a violation of this chapter, and shall be punishable as such.

[ 1935 c 31 s 20; RRS s 9558-20.]